Massachusetts, session 194th, H4040.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) The department of environmental protection in consultation with the department of
public health shall study, examine and report on the potential environmental and economic
impacts caused by the discharge of spent fuel pool water, including discharge by any means or
methods that increases the rate of evaporation of any materials created as a waste product of
nuclear energy from spent fuel pools including, but not limited to, processed water or any other
liquid with elevated levels of radioactivity including, but not limited to, tritium or boron
associated with the decommissioning of the any nuclear power plant.
(b) The study shall include, but not be limited to: (i) examining and investigating the
potential environmental and economic impacts of discharge, including discharge by any means
or methods that increases the rate of evaporation; (ii) analyzing the impacts to consumer
perception of the discharge of spent fuel wastewater on the fishing, aquaculture, tourism,
restaurant industries and other sectors deemed appropriate by the department of environmental
of 2

protection in consultation with the department of public health; (iii) undertaking regular
monitoring of the land, air and water to determine the pollution levels created by discharge,
including discharge by any means or methods that increase the rate of evaporation; and (iv)
making recommendations on measures to mitigate or avoid potential negative impacts on such
industries.
(c) The department of environmental protection pursuant to section 16K of chapter 132A
of the General Laws, in consultation with the office of coastal zone management, shall not allow
the discharge of spent fuel pool water, including discharge by: (i) any means or methods that
increase the rate of evaporation of spent fuel pool water; or (ii) any materials created as a waste
product of nuclear energy from spent fuel pools including, but not limited to, processed water or
any other liquid with elevated levels of radioactivity including, but not limited to, tritium or
boron into the waters of the commonwealth until 90 days after the department of environmental
protection in consultation with the department of public health issues its report.
(d) The department of environmental protection shall submit a report detailing the results
of the study, along with recommendations and any proposed standards and legislation necessary
to carry out its recommendations, to the: (i) the joint committee on public health; (ii) the joint
committee on environmental and natural resources; and (iii) clerks of the house of
representatives and senate not later than December 31, 2026.
of 2